Hawaii statutes.
§621C-3 Use immunity. The testimony or
production that is compelled under the order, and any information directly or
indirectly derived from the testimony or production, may not be used against
the person in any manner in a criminal case, except in a prosecution for
perjury, for giving a false statement, or for an offense involving a failure to
comply with the order; provided that such person may be prosecuted or punished
for any crime so long as testimony or production that is compelled under the
order, and any information directly or indirectly derived from such testimony
or production, is not used against such person in such prosecution. [L 1978, c
212, pt of §2]

Cross References

Antitrust proceedings, see §480-23.2.

Case Notes

Use immunity granted by section is inadequate to supplant the
privilege against self-incrimination conferred by article I, §10 of the state
constitution. 62 H. 269, 614 P.2d 915 (1980).

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next